Utah statutes.
53-2-503.   Statewide mutual aid committee.

(1) (a)  There is established a statewide mutual aid committee consisting of:

(i)  the director, who shall chair the committee;

(ii)  one or more representatives from state agencies that provide public safety service, appointed by the director;

(iii)  one or more representatives of counties, appointed by the director after considering recommendations from the Utah Association of Counties;

(iv)  one or more representatives of municipalities, appointed by the director after considering recommendations from the Utah League of Cities and Towns; and

(v)  one or more representatives of public safety districts and public safety interlocal entities, appointed by the director after considering recommendations from the Utah Association of Special Districts.

(b)  The term of each member appointed under Subsections (1)(a)(ii) through (v) shall be two years.

(c)  A committee member may not receive compensation for service on the committee in addition to any compensation received as an employee or official of a state agency or participating political subdivision.

(2)  The committee shall meet at least annually to:

(a)  review the progress and status of the statewide mutual aid system;

(b)  assist in developing methods to track and evaluate activation of the system; and

(c)  examine issues facing participating political subdivisions regarding implementation of this part.

(3)  The committee shall develop comprehensive guidelines and procedures that address the operation of the system, including:

(a)  projected or anticipated costs of responding to emergencies;

(b)  checklists for requesting and providing assistance;

(c)  record keeping for participating political subdivisions;

(d)  reimbursement procedures and other necessary implementation elements and necessary forms for requests; and

(e)  other records documenting deployment and return of assets.

(4)  The committee may prepare an annual report on the condition and effectiveness of the statewide mutual aid system, make recommendations for correcting any deficiencies, and submit the report to an appropriate legislative committee.



Enacted by Chapter 331, 2007 General Session

